test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ihkwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ihkwa - ok : # -m animate noun, louse
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg: ihkwa
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitihkom
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitihkom
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otihkoma
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otihkomiyiwa
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitihkominân
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitihkominaw
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitihkomiwâw
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otihkomiwâwa
     ihkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otihkomiyiwa

     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl: ihkwak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitihkomak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitihkomak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otihkoma
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otihkomiyiwa
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitihkominânak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitihkominawak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitihkomiwâwak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otihkomiwâwa
     ihkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otihkomiyiwa

     ihkwa+N+AN+Obv: ihkwa
     ihkwa+N+AN+Loc: ihkohk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitihkomihk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitihkomihk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otihkomihk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otihkomiyihk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitihkominâhk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitihkominâhk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitihkomiwâhk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otihkomiwâhk
     ihkwa+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otihkomiyihk

     ihkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: ihkosis
     ihkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: ihkosisak
     ihkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [ihkosisinâhk, ihkosisihk]
     ihkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicihkosis
     ihkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicihkosis
